North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Article 5. Revenue Bonds.
§ 159-90.
Limitations on details of bonds; additional provisions.

In fixing the details of revenue bonds, the State or the issuing municipality, as the case may be, shall be subject to the following restrictions and directions:

The maturity dates may not exceed the maximum maturity periods prescribed by the Commission for general obligation bonds pursuant to

G.S. 159-122

. For bonds issued in reimbursement of a loan or advance, the maximum maturity period to be used in determining the maturity dates of the bonds shall be the maximum permissible period prescribed by the Commission for the original project for which the loan or advance was expended, calculated from the date the original project is completed.

Any bond may be made subject to redemption prior to maturity, including redemption on demand of the holder, with or without premium, on such notice and at such time or times and with such redemption provisions as may be stated. When any such bond shall have been validly called for redemption and provision shall have been made for the payment of the principal thereof, any redemption premium, and the interest thereon accrued to the date of redemption, interest thereon shall cease.

The bonds may bear interest at such rate or rates, payable semiannually or otherwise, may be in such denominations, and may be payable in such kind of money and in such place or places within or without the State of North Carolina, as the State Treasurer or the issuing municipality, as the case may be, may determine.

In addition to the foregoing provisions of this section, in fixing the details of revenue bonds the State or the issuing municipality, as the case may be, may provide that bonds

May be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner provided a Credit Facility supports such bonds, unless the Commission specifically determines that a Credit Facility is not required upon a finding and determination by the Commission that the proposed bonds will satisfy the conditions set forth in G.S. 159-86(b);

May be additionally supported by a Credit Facility;

May be made subject to redemption prior to maturity, with or without premium, on such notice and at such time or times and with such redemption provisions as may be stated in the bond order or trust agreement or with such variations as may be permitted in connection with a Par Formula provided in such bond order or trust agreement;

May bear interest, notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 159-125(a)

, at a rate or rates that may vary as permitted pursuant to a Par Formula and for such period or periods of time, all as may be provided in the bond order or trust agreement; and

May be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made to remarket the bonds to new purchasers prior to their presentment for payment to the provider of the Credit Facility or to the issuing municipality or the State.No Credit Facility, repayment agreement, Par Formula or remarketing agreement shall become effective without the approval of the Commission.As used in this subsection, the following terms shall have the following meanings:“Credit Facility” means an agreement entered into by an issuing municipality or by the State Treasurer on behalf of the State with a bank, savings and loan association or other banking institution, an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company or other insurance institution, a corporation, investment banker or other investment institution, or any financial institution providing for prompt payment of all or any part of the principal (whether at maturity, presentment for purchase, redemption or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds payable on demand or tender by the owner issued in accordance with this section, in consideration of the issuing municipality or the State agreeing to repay the provider of such Credit Facility in accordance with the terms and provisions of such repayment agreement, provided, that any such repayment agreement shall provide that the obligation of the issuing municipality or the State thereunder shall have only such sources of payment as are permitted for the payment of bonds issued under this Article.“Par Formula” shall mean any provision or formula adopted by the issuing municipality or the State to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any such bonds so that the purchase price of such bonds in the open market would be as close to par as possible.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 2, s. 5; 1949, c. 1081; 1967, c. 100, s. 1; c. 711, s. 2; 1969, c. 688, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1983, c. 554, s. 11; 1985, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 508, s. 4.

§ 159-91.
Lien of revenue bonds.

All revenue bonds issued under this Article shall be equally and ratably secured by a pledge, charge, and lien upon revenues provided for in the bond order, without priority by reason of number, or of dates of bonds, execution or delivery, in accordance with the provisions of this Article and of the bond order; except that the State or a municipality may provide in a revenue bond order that revenue bonds issued pursuant thereto shall to the extent and in the manner prescribed in the order or agreement be subordinated and junior in standing, with respect to the payment of principal and interest and the security thereof, to any other revenue bonds.

Any pledge made by the State or a municipality pursuant to this Article shall be valid and binding from the date of final passage of the bond order upon the issuance of any bonds or bond anticipation notes thereunder. The revenues, securities, and other moneys so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the State or a municipality, as the case may be, or any fiduciary shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the State or a municipality, as the case may be, without regard to whether such parties have notice thereof. The bond order by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded in any manner other than as provided in this Chapter.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1983, c. 554, s. 12.

§ 159-92.
Status of revenue bonds under Uniform Commercial Code.

Whether or not the revenue bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto are of such form and character as to be investment securities under Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State, all revenue bonds represented by instruments and interest coupons appertaining thereto issued under this Article are hereby made investment securities within the meaning of and for all the purposes of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State, subject only to the provisions of the bonds pertaining to registration.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1983, c. 322, s. 3.

§ 159-93.
Agreement of the State.

The State of North Carolina does pledge to and agree with the holders of any revenue bonds or revenue bond anticipation notes heretofore or hereafter issued by the State or any municipality in this State that so long as any such bonds or notes are outstanding and unpaid the State will not limit or alter the rights vested in the State or the municipality at the time of issuance of the bonds or notes to establish, maintain, revise, charge, and collect such rates, fees, rentals, tolls, and other charges for the use, services, facilities, and commodities of or furnished by the revenue bond project in connection with which the bonds or notes, or bonds or notes refunded by the bonds or notes, were issued as shall produce revenues at least sufficient with other available funds to meet the expense of maintenance and operation of and renewal and replacements to such project, including reserves therefor, to pay when due the principal, interest, and redemption premiums (if any) of the bonds or notes, and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the bondholders or noteholders, nor will the State in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders or noteholders until the bonds or notes and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders or noteholders, are fully paid, met, and discharged.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 20; 1983, c. 554, s. 13.

§ 159-94.
Limited liability.

Revenue bonds shall be special obligations of the State or the municipality issuing them. The principal of and interest on revenue bonds shall not be payable from the general funds of the State or the municipality, as the case may be, nor shall they constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any of its property or upon any of its income, receipts, or revenues, except the funds which are pledged under the bond order authorizing the bonds. Neither the credit nor the taxing power of the State or the municipality, as the case may be, are pledged for the payment of the principal or interest of revenue bonds, and no holder of revenue bonds has the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the State or the municipality, as the case may be, or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon. Every revenue bond shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond is payable solely from the revenues pledged to its payment and that the State or the municipality, as the case may be, is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from such revenues.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 39, effective November 29, 2001.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 2, s. 7; 1953, c. 922, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1983, c. 554, s. 14; 1989, c. 168, s. 43; 2001-474, s. 39.

§ 159-95.
Approval of State agencies.

The general design and plan of any revenue bond project undertaken for water systems or facilities or sewage disposal systems or facilities shall be subject to the approval of the Commission for Public Health or the State Environmental Management Commission to the same extent that such projects would be if they were not financed by revenue bonds, and the provisions of the revenue bond order shall be consistent with any requirements imposed on the project by the Commission for Public Health or the State Environmental Management Commission. No revenue bond project for the acquisition or construction of systems or facilities for the generation, production, or transmission of gas or electric power may be undertaken by the State or a municipality unless the State or municipality, as the case may be, shall first obtain a certificate of convenience and necessity from the North Carolina Utilities Commission.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 2, s. 9; 1949, c. 1081; 1967, c. 555; 1969, c. 688, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 494, s. 21; c. 1262, s. 23; 1983, c. 554, s. 15; 2007-182, s. 2.

§ 159-96.
Limitation on extraterritorial operation of enterprises financed by revenue bonds.

Each utility or public service enterprise listed in G.S. 159-81(3), if financed wholly or partially by revenue bonds issued under this Article, shall be owned or operated by the municipality for its own use and for the use of public and private consumers residing within its corporate limits or, in the case of a joint agency or undertaking established pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, for the use of the municipalities that established the joint agency or undertaking and for the use of the public and private consumers residing within their corporate limits. A utility or public service enterprise financed wholly or partially by revenue bonds, when operated primarily for the municipality’s own use and for users within its corporate limits or, in the case of two or more municipalities participating in a joint agency or undertaking, when operated primarily for the use of the municipalities that established the joint agency or undertaking, may be operated incidentally for users outside the corporate limits of either the issuing unit or a participating municipality. Provided, however, that revenue bonds may be issued for the purpose of financing in whole or in part mass transit systems, aeronautical facilities, marine facilities and systems, systems or facilities for the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of gas (natural, artificial, or mixed), facilities and equipment for the collection, treatment or disposal of solid waste, notwithstanding that such systems, facilities or equipment may be operated for users outside the corporate limits of a municipality that is an issuing unit where the municipality finds that the systems, facilities, or equipment so financed would benefit the municipality or, in the case of two or more municipalities participating in a joint agency or undertaking, where the municipalities that are the issuing units find that the systems, facilities, or equipment so financed would benefit the municipalities that established the joint agency or undertaking.Revenue bonds may not be issued for the purpose of financing in whole or in part systems or facilities for the transmission or distribution of gas (natural, artificial, or mixed) to users outside the corporate limits of a municipality to whom service is available or will be available within a reasonable time from a local distribution natural gas utility pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the North Carolina Utilities Commission. A finding by the governing body of a municipality that is an issuing unit that the systems or facilities to be provided by the financing will not provide service to users to whom such service is available or will be available within a reasonable time from a local distribution natural gas utility shall be conclusive upon (i) the expiration of a 45 day period following the making of such finding, (ii) the mailing by the municipality of a copy of such notice within five days after the making of such finding to any local distribution company certificated to provide service to the area in which the facilities are to be located, and (iii) the absence of a written objection to such finding being mailed by any such certificated local distribution company to the municipality by not later than five days prior to the end of such 45 day period, all such mailings to be properly given or made if sent by United States registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid. Time shall be computed pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 6(a).

A revenue bond project financed wholly or partially by revenue bonds of the State may be located either within or without the State and, when operated primarily for the State’s own use and for users within the State, may be operated incidentally for users outside the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 39, effective November 29, 2001.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section and

G.S. 160A-312

, municipalities may acquire sewage collection and disposal systems and water supply and distribution systems located within and without the corporate limits of such municipalities and finance such acquisition with revenue bonds. Further, municipalities may own, maintain and operate such acquired systems, enlarge and improve such acquired systems and finance the enlargement and improvement of such acquired systems with revenue bonds. This subsection applies only to acquisitions by municipalities financed by revenue bonds during the calendar year ending December 31, 1989.

In the case of a Turnpike Project of the North Carolina Turnpike Authority, the Turnpike Project may be located anywhere in the State the Authority is authorized to maintain a Turnpike Project.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 1325; 1983, c. 554, s. 16; c. 795, s. 5; 1989, c. 168, s. 44; c. 263; 1991, c. 511, s. 1; 2001-414, s. 50; 2001-474, s. 39; 2002-133, s. 8.

§ 159-97.
Taxes for supplementing revenue bond projects.

For the purpose of supplementing the revenues of a revenue bond project, as defined in this section, any county or city may covenant with, or may enter into an agreement with a municipality for the benefit of the holders of revenue bonds of the issuing municipality issued pursuant to this Article, whereby such county or city agrees to:

Levy for the life of all revenue bonds issued in connection with the revenue bond project an annual property tax not in excess of the rate set forth in the question submitted to voters as hereinafter provided, such levy to be based upon the operating supplement requirement, as defined in this section, or

Levy for the life of the revenue bonds in respect of which such tax is being levied an annual property tax not in excess of the rate required to pay the principal of and the interest on the aggregate principal amount of revenue bonds set forth in the question submitted to the voters as hereinafter provided, such levy to be based upon the debt service reserve supplement requirement, as defined in this section.When any such covenant has been made or any such agreement has been entered into, the issuing municipality shall determine, and, in those instances in which the issuing municipality is not also the taxing county or city, the issuing municipality shall certify to the governing board of the taxing county or city, by not later than June 1 of each fiscal year the amount required, determined as hereinafter provided, to be raised by taxation by such county or city in the next fiscal year. The county or city is obligated to levy such tax only to the extent that an operating supplement requirement or a debt service reserve supplement requirement shall occur during the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year in which the tax is to be levied. In no event shall the county or city be required to levy a tax in excess of the rate required to be levied in accordance with the approval of the voters as provided in subsection (c). When any such tax is to be levied, the county or city shall include in its budget ordinance an appropriation to the issuing municipality or the appropriate fund, as the case may be, equal to the estimated yield of the tax levy, and shall pay such appropriation to the issuing municipality or transfer moneys to the appropriate fund in equal monthly installments unless another mutually satisfactory schedule of payments is agreed upon.

A covenant made, or the pledge of an agreement entered into, by a county or city pursuant to this section shall be effected by the provisions of the revenue bond order or the trust agreement securing revenue bonds of the issuing municipality and where the issuing municipality is not also the taxing county or city a resolution of the county or city approving the appropriate provisions of the bond order or trust agreement relating to the pledge of the tax. If the taxing county or city is not the issuing municipality, it shall file an application for approval of the resolution with the secretary of the Commission in the manner provided in

G.S. 159-149

, and the Commission shall determine whether to approve the application as provided by

G.S. 159-151

and 159-152; provided, however, that

G.S. 159-148

and 159-150 shall have no application to this section.

A covenant made, or agreement entered into, by a county or city pursuant to this section shall take effect only if approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of those who vote thereon in a referendum held in the taxing county or city. The referendum shall be called and held as provided in

G.S. 159-61

, except that

The ballot proposition shall be in substantially one of the following forms:Operating Supplement Requirement: “Shall the (order or agreement) binding the (taxing county or city) to levy annually a tax on property not in excess of _______________ cents on the one hundred dollars ($100.00) value of property subject to taxation for the purpose of supplementing the revenues of (revenue bond project) in instances where the gross revenues of the project are estimated to be less than the estimated total costs of the (i) current operating expenses of the project, (ii) amount required to maintain the debt service reserve by repaying any withdrawals therefrom in respect of all outstanding bonds issued in connection with the project and (iii) debt service on all outstanding bonds issued in connection with the project, all as defined in such (order or agreement), the proceeds of such tax to be used for the payment of the current operating expenses of the project so long as any revenue bonds issued therefor remain outstanding and unpaid, be approved?

Click to view
Debt Service Reserve Supplement Requirement:
“Shall the (order or agreement) binding the (taxing county or city) to levy annually, without limitation as to rate or amount, a tax on property subject to taxation for the purpose of supplementing the revenues of (revenue bond project) for maintaining the debt service reserve required by said (order or agreement) in connection with the issuance of not in excess of $
_______________
revenue bonds of (the issuing municipality), so long as any of such revenue bonds remain outstanding and unpaid, be approved?

Click to view

and

The published statement of result shall have the following statement appended:“Any action or proceeding challenging the regularity or validity of this supplemental tax referendum must be begun within 30 days after (date of publication).

Click to view

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside a supplemental tax referendum held under this section, or to obtain any other relief, upon the ground that the referendum is invalid or was irregularly conducted, must be begun within 30 days after the publication of the statement of the result of the referendum. After the expiration of this period of limitation, no right of action or defense based upon the invalidity of or any irregularity in the referendum shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the referendum be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding begun within the period of limitation prescribed in this subsection.

An order or agreement submitted to and approved by the voters pursuant to this section may be repealed at any time before bonds are issued pursuant thereto.

In instances where the taxing county or city is not the issuing municipality, such county or city may levy taxes as provided for in this section in respect of a revenue bond project located outside its corporate limits provided that such county or city is entitled by law to appoint one or more members of the governing body of such municipality.

For the purposes of this section,

A “revenue bond project” is limited, notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 159-81

, to (i) aeronautical facilities, including but not limited to airports, terminals and hangars, (ii) hospitals and other health-related facilities, and (iii) systems, facilities and equipment for the collection, treatment or disposal of solid waste within the meaning of said

G.S. 159-81

;

An “operating supplement requirement” occurs when, as set forth in the budget prepared by the issuing municipality in respect of the revenue bond project, the estimated cost in the next succeeding fiscal year of the (i) current operating expenses of the revenue bond project, (ii) amount required to maintain the debt service reserve by repaying any withdrawals therefrom in respect of all outstanding bonds issued in connection with the revenue bond project, and (iii) debt service on all outstanding bonds issued in connection with the revenue bond project, are in excess of the pledged revenues of the revenue bond project for such fiscal year as estimated by the issuing municipality, excluding taxes levied pursuant to this section; provided, however, that the amount of the operating supplement requirement shall not exceed the total amount of the current operating expenses of the revenue bond project mentioned in clause (i) above, and

A “debt service reserve supplement requirement” occurs when there have been withdrawn from the debt service reserve any moneys for the purpose of paying debt service on the bonds in respect of which the supplemental tax has been authorized by the voters; provided, however, that the amount of the debt service reserve supplement requirement shall not exceed the amount so withdrawn.

Any covenant or agreement of a county or city made pursuant to this section, and the obligations assumed thereby, shall be excludable from the gross debt of the county or city for purposes of the statement of debt mentioned in

G.S. 159-55

.

For the purposes of this section the terms county or city shall include a special airport district with respect to financing of aeronautical facilities.

[
] Yes [
] No”

[
] Yes [
] No”

(title of governing board).’’

History.

1973, c. 786, s. 1; 1979, c. 727, s. 5; 1983, c. 795, s. 6.

§ 159-98.

Reserved for future codification purposes.